North Carolina, session 2025, HB359.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the City of Jacksonville
(city) the sum of two million dollars ($2,000,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal
year to be used by the city for water and wastewater infrastructure projects.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*H359-v-1*